Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.79.010

Powers to acquire, use and manage.

A code city shall have all powers provided by general law to cities of any class relating to the receipt of donations of money and property, the acquisition, leasing and disposition of municipal property, both real and personal, including, but not limited to, the following: (1) Intergovernmental leasing, transfer or disposition of property as provided by chapter 39.33 RCW; (2) disposition of unclaimed property as provided by chapters 63.32 and 63.21 RCW; (3) disposition of local improvement district foreclosures as provided by chapter 35.53 RCW; (4) materials removed from public lands as provided by *RCW 79.90.150; (5) purchase of federal surplus property as provided by chapter 39.32 RCW; and (6) land for recreation as provided by **chapter 43.99 RCW. A code city in connection with the acquisition of property shall be subject to provisions relating to tax liens as provided by RCW 84.60.050 and 84.60.070. The general law relating to the damage or destruction of public property of a code city or interferences with the duties of a police or other officer shall relate to code city's properties and officers to the same extent as such laws apply to any class of city, its property or officers.

[ 1983 c 3 s 72; 1979 ex.s. c 30 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.79.010.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 79.90.150 was recodified as RCW 79.140.110 pursuant to 2005 c 155 s 1011.

**(2) Chapter 43.99 RCW was recodified as chapter 79A.25 RCW pursuant to 1999 c 249 s 1601.